District of Columbia statutes.
5-302

Restrictions on powers and duties of federal law enforcement officers.

Officers when acting under the authority granted in § 5-301(a) shall be subject to the restrictions imposed on MPD officers under the laws codified in Chapter 1 of this title. These restrictions include, but are not limited to, arrests under § 5-115.01, use of unnecessary or wanton force under § 5-123.02, and the use of trachea and carotid artery holds under §§ 5-125.02 and 5-125.03.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-100, § 3, 46 DCR 794